Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 500 of Title 72, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Any state benefits available to one-hundred-percent disabled
veterans shall meet the benefit qualifications provided under 38
U.S.C., Section 1151.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.






ENGR. H. B. NO. 3257 Page 1

Passed the House of Representatives the 18th day of February,
2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the ___ day of _________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate
















ENGR. H. B. NO. 3257 Page 2